Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5429SV (1) 91 jda/jh S.F. 2405 Section 1. Section 261H.8, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. The president, vice presidents, 3 deans, department directors, or any other administrator of a 4 public institution of higher education shall ensure that all 5 employees of the public institution of higher education under 6 the supervision of such person, whether directly or indirectly, 7 and all contractors engaged by such person, whether directly 8 or indirectly, to provide staff or student training receive 9 training related to the requirements and prohibitions of this 10 section. 11 Sec. 2. Section 279.74, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 2. a. Each school district may continue training that 14 fosters a workplace and learning environment that is respectful 15 of all employees and students. However, the superintendent of 16 each school district , each employee of the school district, 17 each contractor hired by the school district, and each 18 volunteer engaged by the school district shall ensure that 19 any all curriculum or mandatory provided by the employee, 20 contractor, or volunteer; all educational materials provided 21 to students by the employee, contractor, or volunteer; and 22 all staff or student training provided by an the employee , of 23 the school district or by a contractor hired by the school 24 district , or volunteer does not teach, advocate, encourage, 25 promote, or act upon specific stereotyping and scapegoating 26 toward others on the basis of demographic group membership or 27 identity. This subsection paragraph shall not be construed 28 as preventing an employee , or contractor , or volunteer who 29 teaches any curriculum or who provides mandatory training from 30 responding to questions regarding specific defined concepts 31 raised by participants in the training. 32 b. (1) A school district shall not expend any moneys 33 appropriated by the general assembly or any other moneys 34 derived from bequests, charges, deposits, donations, 35 -1- LSB 5429SV (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 5 S.F. 2405 endowments, fees, grants, gifts, income, receipts, tuition, 1 chapter 257 or 284, or any other source to provide any 2 curriculum, educational materials, or staff or student 3 training, either directly or indirectly, that violates 4 paragraph âaâ . 5 (2) A school district shall not use any of the school 6 districtâs resources, facilities, or staff or student time 7 to violate paragraph âaâ or encourage any person to violate 8 paragraph âaâ . 9 Sec. 3. Section 279.74, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 10 following new subsections: 11 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. a. The superintendent of each school 12 district shall ensure that all of the following individuals 13 receive training related to the requirements and prohibitions 14 of this section: 15 (1) Employees of the school district. 16 (2) Contractors hired by the school district to provide 17 curriculum, educational materials, or staff or student 18 training. 19 (3) Volunteers engaged by the school district to provide 20 curriculum, educational materials, or staff or student 21 training. 22 b. The training related to the requirements and prohibitions 23 of this section must be of the same quality, and must be 24 conducted in the same manner, as other training courses and 25 professional development programs provided to employees of the 26 school district through area education agencies. 27 c. The school district shall track each employeeâs, 28 contractorâs, and volunteerâs completion of the training 29 related to the requirements and prohibitions of this section 30 in the same manner that the school district tracks employee 31 completion of other required training courses and professional 32 development programs. 33 NEW SUBSECTION . 2B. a. Any of the following individuals 34 may bring a civil action for injunctive relief against a school 35 -2- LSB 5429SV (1) 91 jda/jh 2/ 5 S.F. 2405 district to prohibit the school district from continuing to 1 violate this section: 2 (1) The parent or guardian of a student who is enrolled in 3 the school district. 4 (2) An employee of the school district. 5 (3) A resident of the school district. 6 b. This subsection shall not be construed to require an 7 individual bringing a civil action under paragraph âaâ to 8 demonstrate that the individual was harmed by the school 9 districtâs violation of this section. 10 Sec. 4. Section 279.74, subsection 4, paragraph d, Code 11 2026, is amended to read as follows: 12 d. Create Except as provided in subsection 2B, create any 13 right or benefit, substantive or procedural, enforceable at 14 law or in equity by any party against the state of Iowa, its 15 departments, agencies, or entities, its officers, employees, 16 or agents, or any other person. 17